Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1104.05
Early Childhood Education Endowment
Fund; funding.

The Early Childhood Education
Endowment Fund shall consist of any funds allocated to the Early Childhood
Education Endowment Fund from funds belonging to the state for educational
purposes described in Article VII, section 7, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2006, LB 1256, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB456, § 2.